Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-516
Harassment of game animals and game birds; use of aircraft, vessel, or vehicle; prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or conveyance of any type to molest, chase, drive, or harass any game animal or game bird or to cause any such animal or bird to depart from its habitat areas, fields, waters, woodlands, or grasslands.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-528;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 236.